Maine, session 132, LD667.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1751, sub-§3-A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 234, §2, is
amended to read:
3-A. Inspection fees fee. An inspection station may charge the following fees: a fee
of not more than 2 1/2 times the State's minimum wage under Title 26, section 664 for an
inspection performed under subsection 2 or 2-A.
A. For inspections performed under subsection 2, the fee may not be more than $12.50;
B. For inspections of pre-1996 model vehicles performed under subsection 2‑A, the
fee may not be more than $15.50; and
C. For inspections of 1996 and subsequent model vehicles performed under subsection
2‑A, the fee may not be more than $18.50.
The inspection fee is payable whether the vehicle passes inspection or not.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1751-A is enacted to read:
§1751-A. Electronic inspection program
The Chief of the State Police may require the use of an electronic inspection program
for the purpose of inspections performed under this chapter. For the purposes of this
section, "electronic inspection program" means a program, designated by the Chief of the
State Police by rule, that uses electronically generated data as part of an inspection and
permits the creation and exchange of an electronic record for maintaining inspection
information.
1. Implementation. The Chief of the State Police may contract with a private entity to
implement an electronic inspection program.
2. Phased approach. The Chief of the State Police may develop by rule an approach
to phase in the implementation of an electronic inspection program throughout the State.
3. Fee. The Chief of the State Police may designate by rule a fee that an inspection
station must pay to the State for each inspection performed using an electronic inspection
program. A fee required under this subsection may not be more than the cost to the State
of using the electronic inspection program to perform an inspection.
4. Rules. The Chief of the State Police shall adopt rules to implement this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
The Chief of the State Police may exempt from the requirements of this section an
inspection station that demonstrates economic hardship as a result of using an electronic
inspection program.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §2307, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
4. Fee. The operator of an official school bus inspection station is entitled to a fee of
$8 not more than 2 1/2 times the State's minimum wage under Title 26, section 664 for each
school bus inspected. The fee does not include labor or material used in correction of faults.
Page 1 - 132LR1365(01)